South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5286.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  No governmental entity of this State, county, municipality, or a political subdivision thereof, shall grant final approval for any applications or permits for, or incentives or other requests related to, a new data center until January 1, 2028. This includes, but is not limited to, rezoning, special exceptions, special use permits, building permits, site plans, plan of development for siting, economic incentives, fee in lieu of taxes, or any other form of incentive. For purposes of this section, "data center" means a facility whose primary services are the storage, management, and processing of digital data and is used to house (i) computer and network systems, including associated components such as servers, network equipment and appliances, telecommunications, and data storage systems; (ii) systems for monitoring and managing infrastructure performance; (iii) equipment used for the transformation, transmission, distribution, or management of at least one megawatt of capacity of electrical power and cooling, including substations, uninterruptible power supply systems, all electrical plant equipment, and associated air handlers; (iv) internet-related equipment and services; (v) data communications connections; (vi) environmental controls; (vii) fire protection systems; and (viii) security systems and services. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----